Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.020

Powers of authorities—Limitations. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

(1) A community preservation and development authority shall have the power to:

(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or private entities;

(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and employees as may be necessary to implement the purposes and duties of an authority;

(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals, associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;

(d) Buy, own, lease, and sell real and personal property;

(e) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;

(f) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;

(g) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission; and

(h) Lend its funds, property, credit, or services for corporate purposes.

(2) A community preservation and development authority has no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special assessments.

(3) A community preservation and development authority that accepts public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:

(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as appropriate, of the state Constitution, and to RCW 42.17A.550; and

(b) May not use the funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political committee.

[ 2011 c 60 s 40; 2009 c 516 s 2; 2007 c 501 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 43.167.020

Powers of authorities—Limitations. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A community preservation and development authority shall have the power to:

(a) Accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from public or private entities;

(b) Employ and appoint such agents, attorneys, officers, and employees as may be necessary to implement the purposes and duties of an authority;

(c) Contract and enter into partnerships with individuals, associations, corporations, and local, state, and federal governments;

(d) Buy, own, lease, and sell real and personal property;

(e) Hold in trust, improve, and develop land;

(f) Invest, deposit, and reinvest its funds;

(g) Incur debt in furtherance of its mission; and

(h) Lend its funds, property, credit, or services for corporate purposes.

(2) A community preservation and development authority has no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special assessments.

(3) A community preservation and development authority that accepts public funds under subsection (1)(a) of this section:

(a) Is subject in all respects to Article VIII, section 5 or 7, as appropriate, of the state Constitution, and to RCW 29B.40.250; and

(b) May not use the funds to support or oppose a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political committee.

[ 2024 c 164 s 526; 2011 c 60 s 40; 2009 c 516 s 2; 2007 c 501 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.